District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.04

Notice of rights to employees.

(a)

An employer shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place a notice of rights in both English and Spanish and provide written notice of an employee's right to a needed reasonable accommodation related to pregnancy, childbirth, related medical conditions, or breastfeeding pursuant to this chapter to:

(1)

New employees at the commencement of employment;

(2)

Existing employees within 120 days after March 3, 2015; and

(3)

An employee who notifies the employer of her pregnancy, or other condition covered by this chapter, within 10 days of the notification.

(b)

The employer shall provide an accurate written translation of the notice of rights to any non-English or non-Spanish speaking employee and as required by § 2-1933.

History

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 5, 61 DCR 11368